Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.01.250 and 2015 c 225 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((It is in the state's interest and to the benefit of the people of the state to encourage the use of electrical vehicles in order to reduce emissions and provide the public with cleaner air.)) This section expressly authorizes the purchase of power at state expense to recharge ((privately and)) publicly owned plug-in electrical vehicles at state office locations where the vehicles are used for state business((, are commute vehicles, or where the vehicles are at the state location for the purpose of conducting business with the state)).(2) The state may provide charging locations for electrical vehicles at state office locations where privately owned vehicles may purchase power from the state. Fees charged by the state must be placed in the motor vehicle fund.(3) The director of the department of enterprise services may report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, as deemed necessary by the director, on the estimated amount of state-purchased electricity consumed by plug-in electrical vehicles if the director of enterprise services determines that the use has a significant cost to the state, and on the number of plug-in electric vehicles using state office locations. The report may be combined with the report under section 401, chapter 348, Laws of 2007.--- END ---